Washington statutes.
RCW 36.57.070

Public transportation plan.

The authority shall adopt a public transportation plan. Such plan shall be a general comprehensive plan designed to best serve the residents of the entire county. Prior to adoption of the plan, the authority shall provide a minimum of sixty days during which sufficient hearings shall be held to provide interested persons an opportunity to participate in development of the plan.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 167 s 7.]